Missouri, session 2026, HB2277.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 442.560, 442.566, 442.571, 442.576, 442.581, 442.586, 442.591,
and 442.592, RSMo, are repealed and eight new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known
as sections 442.560, 442.566, 442.571, 442.576, 442.581, 442.586, 442.592, and 442.594, to
read as follows:
442.560. Except as provided in sections 442.560 to [442.591] 442.594, persons not
citizens of the United States and not residents of the United States or of some territory,
trusteeship, or protectorate of the United States, and corporations not created by or under the
laws of the United States or of some state, territory, trusteeship, or protectorate of the United
States shall be capable of acquiring, by grant, purchase, devise or descent, real estate except
agricultural land as defined in section 442.566, or any interest therein, in this state, and of
owning, holding, devising, or alienating the same, and shall incur the like duties and liabilities
in relation thereto as if they were citizens of the United States and residents of this state. The
provisions of sections 442.560 to [442.591] 442.594 shall not apply to agricultural land
located in counties which border the state of Oklahoma which was owned by such a person
described in this section prior to January 1, 1995.
442.566. As used in sections 442.560 to [442.591] 442.594, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, the following terms mean:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2277 2
(1) "Agricultural land", any tract of land in this state consisting of more than five
acres, whether inside or outside the corporate limits of any municipality, which is capable,
without substantial modification to the character of the land, of supporting an agricultural
enterprise, including but not limited to land used for the production of agricultural crops or
fruit or other horticultural products, or for the raising or feeding of animals for the production
of livestock or livestock products, poultry or poultry products, or milk or dairy products.
Adjacent parcels of land under the same ownership shall be deemed to be a single tract;
(2) "Alien", any person who is not a citizen of the United States and who is not a
resident of the United States or of some state, territory, trusteeship, or protectorate of the
United States;
(3) "Director", the director of the Missouri department of agriculture;
(4) "Family members" includes all persons within the ninth degree of consanguinity,
or the living or surviving spouse of any person within the ninth degree of consanguinity;
(5) "Foreign adversary", a foreign government or foreign nongovernmental
person who is identified as a foreign adversary under 15 CFR Section 791.4(a), as
amended;
[(5)] (6) "Foreign business", any business entity, whether or not incorporated,
including,but not limited to, companies,corporations, professional corporations, nonprofit
corporations, limited liability companies, partnerships, limited partnerships, [and]
associations, or the equivalent of any entity listed in this subdivision, in which [a
controlling] an interest is owned by aliens or organized under the laws of a foreign
country, or both. In determining ownership of a foreign business, legal fictions such as
corporate form or trust shall be disregarded;
(7) "Foreign terrorist organization", an organization that has been designated
or redesignated by the United States Secretary of State to have engaged in terrorist
activity as defined under 8 U.S.C. Section 1182(a)(3)(B), as amended, or terrorism as
defined in 22 U.S.C. Section 2656f(d)(2), as amended, and for which a Federal Register
notice has been made under 8 U.S.C. Section 1189(a)(2)(A)(ii), as amended;
(8) "Land", any real property of any classification or subclassification within
this state;
[(6)] (9) "Residence", the place of general abode; the place of general abode of a
person means his principal, actual dwelling place in fact, where he intends to remain
permanently or for an indefinite period of time at least[.];
(10) "Specially designated global terrorist", an individual or entity that has been
designated by the President of the United States, the United States Secretary of State, or
the United States Secretary of the Treasury, for which a Federal Register notice has
been made under Executive Order 13224, 31 CFR Part 594.

HB 2277 3
442.571. 1. Except as provided in [sections] section 442.586 [and 442.591],
beginning August 28, 2026, no alien or foreign business shall acquire by grant, purchase,
devise, descent or otherwise agricultural land in this state if the total aggregate alien and
foreign ownership of agricultural [acreage] land in this state exceeds one percent of the total
aggregate agricultural [acreage] land in this state. A sale or transfer of any agricultural land
in this state shall be submitted by such alien or foreign business to the director of the
department of agriculture and the attorney generalfor review in accordance with subsection
3 of this section [only if there is no completed Internal Revenue Service Form W-9 signed by
the purchaser] at least thirty calendar days prior to when such sale or transfer of such
agricultural land is finalized. The attorney general shall review such sale or transfer
and, within thirty days of receipt, approve or reject such transaction. If the attorney
general does not take action on such sale or transfer within thirty days, the transaction
shall be deemed to meet the requirements of this section. Such sale or transfer
submitted for review shall be deemed a closed record under chapter 610 until such sale
or transfer is finalized. No person may hold agricultural land as an agent, trustee, or other
fiduciary for an alien or foreign business in violation of sections 442.560 to [442.592]
442.594, provided, however, that no security interest in such agricultural land shall be
divested or invalidated by such violation.
2. Any alien or foreign business who acquires agricultural land in violation of
sections 442.560 to [442.592] 442.594 remains in violation of sections 442.560 to [442.592]
442.594for as long as [he or she] such alien or foreign businessholds an interest in the land,
provided, however, that no security interest in such agricultural land shall be divested or
invalidated by such violation.
3. (1) Subject to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section, such proposed
acquisitions by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise of agricultural land in this state
shall be submitted to the department of agriculture and the attorney general to determine
whether such acquisition of agricultural land is conveyed in accordance with the one percent
restriction on the total aggregate alien and foreign ownership of agricultural land in this state.
Such submission shall be accomplished in the form and manner established by the
department of agriculture. The attorney general shall review each submission that the
attorney general receives under this subsection and investigate such acquisition of
agricultural land if the attorney general believes such acquisition violates this section.
(2) All land acquired in violation of this section is subject to a court action and
divestiture under section 442.576.
(3) The department of agriculture and the attorney general shall establish by rule
the requirements for submission and approval of requests under this subsection.

HB 2277 4
4. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2014, shall be invalid
and void.
442.576. 1. If the [director] attorney general finds that an alien or foreign business
or an agent, trustee, or other fiduciary therefor has acquired [agricultural] land in Missouri in
violation of sections 442.560 to [442.592] 442.594, or the land ceases to be used for
nonagricultural purposes [under section 442.591], he or she shall [report the violation to the
attorney general.
2. The attorney general shall] institute an action in the circuit court of Cole County or
the circuit court in any county in which [agricultural] land owned by the alien or foreign
business, agent, trustee or other fiduciary, alleged to have violated sections 442.560 to
[442.592] 442.594, is located.
[3.] 2. The attorney general shall file a notice of the pendency of the action with the
recorder of deeds of each county in which any portion of such [agricultural] lands is located.
If the court finds that the lands in question have been acquired in violation of sections
442.560 to [442.592] 442.594, it shall enter an order so declaring and shall file a copy of the
order with the recorder of deeds of each county in which any portion of the [agricultural]
lands is located. The court shall order the owner to divest [himself] from ownership of the
[agricultural] land. The owner must comply with the order within two years. The two-year
limitation period shall be a covenant running with the title to the land against any alien
grantee or assignee. [Provided, however, an incorporated foreign business must divest itself
of agricultural land within the minimum time required by Article XI, Section 5, of the
Missouri Constitution. ] Any [agricultural] lands not divested within the time prescribed shall
be ordered sold by the court at a public sale in the manner prescribed by law for the
foreclosure of a mortgage on real estate for default in payment.
442.581. Any person who obtains a lease on agricultural land for a term of ten years
or longer or a lease renewable at his option for terms which might total ten years has acquired
agricultural land within the meaning of sections 442.560 to [442.591] 442.594.
442.586. Sections 442.560 to [442.591] 442.594 shall not apply to agricultural land
now owned in this state by aliens or foreign businesses so long as it is held by the present
owners or their direct descendants including any trust for the benefit of either and any legal
person owned or controlled by either including but not limited to corporations, limited

HB 2277 5
liability corporations, partnerships, and limited liability partnerships, nor to any alien who is
or shall take up bona fide residence in the United States; and any alien who is or shall become
a bona fide resident of the United States shall have the right to acquire and hold agricultural
lands in this state upon the same terms as citizens of the United States during the continuance
of such bona fide residence in the United States; except, that if any resident alien shall cease
to be a bona fide resident of the United States, such alien shall have two years from the time
he ceased to be a bona fide resident in which to divest himself of such agricultural lands. Any
agricultural lands not divested within the time prescribed shall be ordered sold by the court at
a public sale in the manner prescribed by law for the foreclosure of a mortgage on real estate
for default in payment.
442.592. 1. For the purposes of this section, the term "foreign person" means:
(1) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States and who has not been
lawfully admitted to the United States for permanent residence under the Immigration and
Nationality Act or who has not been made a citizen by an act of Congress;
(2) An entity, other than an individual or a government, that is created or organized
under the laws of a nation other than the United States, or that has its principal place of
business in a foreign nation;
(3) An entity, other than an individual or a government, that is created or organized
under the laws of the United States or of some state, territory, trusteeship or protectorate of
the United States and that, as defined in regulations to be prescribed by the director, is
[substantially] controlled by individuals referred to in subdivision (1) of this subsection,
entities referred to in subdivision (2) of this subsection, governments of foreign nations, or
any combination of such individuals, entities, or governments; [and]
(4) A foreign business, as defined in section 442.566; and
(5) A government of a foreign nation.
2. [Any foreign person who holds any interest (including leaseholds of ten or more
years and beneficial interests in the agricultural land under contracts of sale or similar
arrangements), other than a security interest, in agricultural land on September 28, 1979, shall
submit, or have a designated agent submit, a report to the director of agriculture not later than
sixty days after September 28, 1979; provided, however, that no reporting requirement
attaches to any holding by an alien or a foreign person or a foreign business of an interest in
agricultural land for the extraction, refining, processing or transportation of oil, gas, coal or
lignite. Such report shall be submitted in such manner as the director shall prescribe by
regulation and shall contain:
(1) The legal name and address of the foreign person;
(2) In any case in which the foreign person is an individual, the citizenship of the
foreign person;

HB 2277 6
(3) In any case in which the foreign person is not an individual or a government:
(a) The nation in which the foreign person is created or organized;
(b) The principal place of business of the foreign person;
(c) The legal name and address of each person who holds a substantial interest (as
defined in regulations to be prescribed by the director) in the foreign person and, in any case
in which the holder of such an interest is an individual, the citizenship of the holder and, in
any case in which the holder of such an interest is not an individual or a government, the
nation in which the holder is created or organized and the principal place of business of the
holder;
(4) The type of interest in the agricultural land that is held by the foreign person;
(5) A legal description of the agricultural land, including the county in which the land
is located and the total acreage involved;
(6) The date of acquisition of the interest and the purchase price paid for, or any other
consideration given for, the interest;
(7) A declaration of the type of agricultural activity engaged in by the reporting
foreign person;
(8) In the case where any foreign person holds an interest in agricultural land for the
purposes outlined in section 442.591, a declaration of intent as to the intended use of the land.
3. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of sections 442.560 to
442.591 shall become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of
section 536.024] The department of agriculture in cooperation with the attorney
general's office may promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined
in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this section shall
become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter
536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to
review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or
adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
[4.] 3. Any foreign person who acquires or transfers any interest (including leaseholds
of ten years or more and beneficial interests in the agricultural land under contracts of sale or
similar arrangements), other than a security interest, in agricultural land shall submit, or have
a designated agent submit, a report to the director and the attorney general not later than
thirty days after the date of such acquisition or transfer; provided, however, that no reporting
requirement attaches to an acquisition or transfer by an alien or a foreign person or a foreign
business of an interest in agricultural land for the extraction, refining, processing, or

HB 2277 7
transportation of oil, gas, coal or lignite. Such report shall be submitted in such manner as the
director shall prescribe by regulation and shall contain:
(1) The legal name and address of the foreign person;
(2) In any case in which the foreign person is an individual, the citizenship of the
foreign person;
(3) In any case in which the foreign person is not an individual or a government:
(a) The nation in which the foreign person is created or organized;
(b) The principal place of business of the foreign person;
(c) The legal name and address of each person who holds a substantial interest (as
defined in regulations to be prescribed by the director) in the foreign person and, in any case
in which the holder of such an interest is an individual, the citizenship of the holder and, in
any case in which the holder of such an interest is not an individual or a government, the
nation in which the holder is created or organized and the principal place of business of the
holder;
(4) The type of interest in the agricultural land that is acquired or transferred by the
foreign person;
(5) A legal description of the agricultural land including the county in which the land
is located and the total acreage involved;
(6) The purchase price paid or received for, or any other consideration given or
received for, the interest;
(7) In any case in which the foreign person transfers the interest, the legal name and
the address of the person to whom the interest is transferred, and
(a) In any case in which the transferee is an individual, the citizenship of the
transferee; and
(b) In any case in which the transferee is not an individual or a government, the nation
in which the transferee is created or organized and the principal place of business of the
transferee;
(8) A declaration of the type of agricultural activity engaged in by the reporting
foreign person;
(9) In the case where any foreign person acquires an interest in agricultural land [for
the purposes outlined in section 442.591], a declaration of intent as to the intended use of the
land.
[5. The director may promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the form and
content of reports required by this section; the procedures for filing such reports; and the
analysis and distribution of findings and determinations based on the reports required by this
100 section.
101 6.] 4. (1) The director, in consultation with the attorney general, shall:

HB 2277 8
102 (a) Analyze the information obtained under this section and determine the effects of
103 foreign persons acquiring, transferring and holding agricultural land, particularly the effects
104 of such acquisitions, transfers and holdings on family farms and rural communities; and
105 (b) Transmit to the governor and each house of the general assembly a report on the
106 director's findings and conclusions regarding each analysis and determination made under
107 paragraph (a) above;
108 (2) An analysis and determination shall be made, and a report on the [director's]
109 findings and conclusions regarding such analysis and determination transmitted[:
110 (a) With respect to information obtained by the director under this section during the
111 six-month period following September 28, 1979, within nine months after such date;
112 (b) With respect to information obtained by the director under this section during the
113 twelve-month period following September 28, 1979, within fifteen months after such date;
114 and
115 (c) With respect to each calendar year following the twelve-month period referred to
116 in paragraph (b),] within ninety days after the end of such calendar year.
117 [7.] 5. Any foreign person who fails to file a report required under the provisions of
118 this section is liable to the state in civil penalty. The civil penalty shall be determined by the
119 circuit court in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent of the fair market value of the
120 interest in agricultural land with respect to which the violations occurred on the date of the
121 assessment of the penalty. The attorney general shall recover the amount of any civil penalty
122 assessed in a civil action in the circuit court in the county in which any part of the land
123 involved is located.
442.594. 1. Except as provided in section 442.586, beginning August 28, 2026, no
foreign adversary, foreign terrorist organization, or specially designated global terrorist
shall possess or acquire, by grant, purchase, devise, descent, or otherwise, land in this
state.
2. The attorney general shall institute an action in the circuit court of Cole
County or the circuit court in any county in which land possessed or acquired by a
foreign adversary, foreign terrorist organization, or specially designated global
terrorist, in violation of subsection 1 of this section, is located.
3. The attorney general shall file a notice of the pendency of the action with the
recorder of deeds of each county in which any portion of such land is located. If the
court finds that the land in question has been acquired in violation of subsection 1 of this
section, it shall enter an order so declaring and shall file a copy of the order with the
recorder of deeds of each county in which any portion of the of the land is located. The
court shall order the owner to divest himself or herself from ownership of the land. The
owner shall comply with the order within two years. The two-year limitation period

HB 2277 9
shall be a covenant running with the title to the land against any alien grantee or
assignee. Any lands not divested within the time prescribed shall be ordered sold by the
court at a public sale in the manner prescribed by law for the foreclosure of a mortgage
on real estate for default in payment.
4. Any violations under this section shall be reported to the attorney general of
Missouri and shall adhere to requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act of 2001, Pub. L.
107-56, as amended. The attorney general shall review each submission that the
attorney general receives under this section and investigate such acquisition of land if
the attorney general believes such acquisition violates this section.
[442.591. The restrictions set forth in sections 442.560 to 442.592
shall not apply to agricultural land or any interest therein acquired by an alien
or foreign business for immediate or potential use in nonfarming purposes. An
alien or foreign business may hold such agricultural land in such acreage as
may be necessary to its nonfarm business operation; provided, however, that
pending the development of agricultural land for nonfarm purposes, such land
may not be used for farming except under lease to a family farm unit; a family
farm corporation defined in section 350.010; an alien or foreign business
which has filed with the director under sections 442.560 to 442.592; or except
when controlled through ownership, options, leaseholds or other agreements
by a corporation which has entered into an agreement with the United States of
America pursuant to the New Community Act of 1968 (Title IV of the Housing
and Urban Development Act of 1969, 42 U.S.C. 3901-3914), as amended, or a
subsidiary or assignee of such a corporation.]
✔